Georgia statutes. TITLE 2 Agriculture
CHAPTER 15 Pacific White Shrimp Aquaculture Development

2-15-1 through 2-15-14.
[Repealed]

History.

Code 1981, §§

2-15-1

through

2-15-1

4, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 948, § 2-1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 838, § 10/SB 388; repealed by Ga. L. 2019, p. 919, § 1-1/HB 553, effective July 1, 2019.

Editor’s notes.

This chapter never became effective as there was no specific appropriation of funds for purposes of this chapter as expressed in a line item of an appropriations Act enacted by the General Assembly at any session of the General Assembly from 2004 through 2018.

Ga. L. 2019, p. 1056, § 54(e)/SB 52, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, effective May 12, 2019, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “In the event of an irreconcilable conflict between a provision in Sections 1 through 53 of this Act and a provision of another Act enacted at the 2019 regular session of the General Assembly, the provision of such other Act shall control over the conflicting provision in Sections 1 through 53 of this Act to the extent of the conflict.” Accordingly, the amendment to Code Section 2-15-1 by Ga. L. 2019, p. 1056, § 2(1)/SB 52, was not given effect.